Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-4603
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Uniform Standard Code for Manufactured Homes and Recreational Vehicles, unless the context otherwise requires:

(1) Camping trailer means a vehicular portable unit mounted on wheels and constructed with collapsible partial side walls which fold for towing by another vehicle and unfold at the campsite to provide temporary living quarters for recreational, camping, or travel use;

(2) Commission means the Public Service Commission;

(3) Dealer means a person licensed by the state pursuant to the Motor Vehicle Industry Regulation Act as a dealer in manufactured homes or recreational vehicles or any other person, other than a manufacturer, who sells, offers to sell, distributes, or leases manufactured homes or new recreational vehicles primarily to persons who in good faith purchase or lease a manufactured home or new recreational vehicle for purposes other than resale;

(4) Defect means a failure to conform to an applicable construction standard that renders the manufactured home or recreational vehicle or any component of the manufactured home or recreational vehicle not fit for the ordinary use for which it was intended but does not result in an unreasonable risk of injury or death to occupants;

(5) Distributor means any person engaged in the sale and distribution of manufactured homes or recreational vehicles for resale;

(6) Failure to conform means a defect, a serious defect, noncompliance, or an imminent safety hazard related to the code;

(7) Fifth-wheel trailer means a unit mounted on wheels, designed to provide temporary living quarters for recreational, camping, or travel use, of such size or weight as not to require a special highway movement permit, and designed to be towed by a motorized vehicle that contains a towing mechanism that is mounted above or forward of the tow vehicle's rear axle;

(8) Gross trailer area means the total plan area measured on the exterior to the maximum horizontal projections of exterior wall in the setup mode and includes all siding, corner trims, moldings, storage spaces, expandable room sections regardless of height, and areas enclosed by windows but does not include roof overhangs. Storage lofts contained within the basic unit shall have ceiling heights less than five feet and shall not constitute additional square footage. Appurtenances, as defined in subdivision (2)(k) of section 60-6,288, shall not be considered in calculating the gross trailer area as provided in such subdivision;

(9) Imminent safety hazard means a hazard that presents an imminent and unreasonable risk of death or severe personal injury;

(10) Manufactured home means a structure, transportable in one or more sections, which in the traveling mode is eight body feet or more in width or forty body feet or more in length or when erected on site is three hundred twenty or more square feet and which is built on a permanent chassis and designed to be used as a dwelling with or without a permanent foundation when connected to the required utilities and includes the plumbing, heating, air conditioning, and electrical systems contained in the structure, except that manufactured home includes any structure that meets all of the requirements of this subdivision other than the size requirements and with respect to which the manufacturer voluntarily files a certification required by the United States Secretary of Housing and Urban Development and complies with the standards established under the National Manufactured Housing Construction and Safety Standards Act of 1974, as such act existed on September 1, 2001, 42 U.S.C. 5401 et seq.;

(11) Manufactured-home construction means all activities relating to the assembly and manufacture of a manufactured home, including, but not limited to, activities relating to durability, quality, and safety;

(12) Manufactured-home safety means the performance of a manufactured home in such a manner that the public is protected against any unreasonable risk of the occurrence of accidents due to the design or construction of such manufactured home or any unreasonable risk of death or injury to the user or to the public if such accidents do occur;

(13) Manufacturer means any person engaged in manufacturing, assembling, or completing manufactured homes or recreational vehicles;

(14) Motor home means a vehicular unit primarily designed to provide temporary living quarters which are built into an integral part of, or permanently attached to, a self-propelled motor vehicle chassis or van, containing permanently installed independent life-support systems that meet the state standard for recreational vehicles and providing at least four of the following facilities: Cooking; refrigeration or ice box; self-contained toilet; heating, air conditioning, or both; a potable water supply system including a faucet and sink; separate one-hundred-twenty-nominal-volt electrical power supply; or LP gas supply;

(15) Noncompliance means a failure to comply with an applicable construction standard that does not constitute a defect, a serious defect, or an imminent safety hazard;

(16) Park model recreational vehicle means a vehicular unit which meets the following criteria:

(a) Is designed and marketed as temporary living quarters for recreational, camping, travel, or seasonal use;

(b) Is not permanently affixed to real property for use as a permanent dwelling;

(c) Is built on a single chassis mounted on wheels with a gross trailer area not exceeding four hundred square feet in the set up mode; and

(d) Is certified by the manufacturer as complying with the ANSI A119.5 Park Model Recreational Vehicle Standard of the American National Standards Institute, 2025 edition;

(17) Person means any individual, partnership, limited liability company, company, corporation, or association engaged in manufacturing, selling, offering to sell, or leasing manufactured homes or recreational vehicles;

(18) Purchaser means the first person purchasing a manufactured home or recreational vehicle in good faith for purposes other than resale;

(19) Recreational vehicle means a vehicular type unit primarily designed as temporary living quarters for recreational, camping, or travel use, which unit either has its own motive power or is mounted on or towed by another vehicle. Recreational vehicle includes, but is not limited to, any travel trailer, park model recreational vehicle, camping trailer, truck camper, and motor home;

(20) Seal means a device or insignia issued by the Department of Health and Human Services Regulation and Licensure prior to May 1, 1998, or by the Public Service Commission on or after May 1, 1998, to be displayed on the exterior of a manufactured home or recreational vehicle to evidence compliance with state standards. The federal manufactured-home label shall be recognized as a seal;

(21) Serious defect means a failure to conform to an applicable construction standard that renders the manufactured home or recreational vehicle or any component of the manufactured home or recreational vehicle not fit for the ordinary use for which it was intended and which results in an unreasonable risk of injury or death to the occupants;

(22) Travel trailer means a vehicular unit mounted on wheels, designed to provide temporary living quarters for recreational, camping, or travel use of such size or weight as not to require special highway movement permits when towed by a motorized vehicle;

(23) Truck camper means a portable unit constructed to provide temporary living quarters for recreational, travel, or camping use, consisting of a roof, floor, and sides and designed to be loaded onto and unloaded from the bed of a pickup truck; and

(24) Van conversion means a completed vehicle permanently altered cosmetically, structurally, or both which has been recertified by the state as a multipurpose passenger vehicle but which does not conform to or otherwise meet the definition of a motor home in this section and which contains at least one plumbing, heating, or one-hundred-twenty-nominal-volt electrical component subject to the provisions of the state standard for recreational vehicles. Van conversion does not include any such vehicle that lacks any plumbing, heating, or one-hundred-twenty-nominal-volt electrical system but contains an extension of the low-voltage automotive circuitry.

Laws 1969, c. 557, § 3, p. 2272;

Laws 1975, LB 300, § 3;

Laws 1985, LB 313, § 7;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 435;

Laws 1993, LB 536, § 86;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 675;

Laws 1998, LB 1073, § 128;

Laws 2001, LB 376, § 6;

Laws 2008, LB797, § 13;

Laws 2010, LB816, § 90;

Laws 2012, LB751, § 48;

Laws 2022, LB1147, § 1;

Laws 2026, LB972, § 75.
October 1, 2026
Motor Vehicle Industry Regulation Act, see section 60-1401.